Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Article 1. General Provisions.

§79-13-101.
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Business” includes every trade, occupation, and profession.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of:

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner’s capacity as a partner or to the partner’s transferee.

“Domestic partnership” means a partnership whose internal relations are governed by the laws of this state.

“Foreign limited liability partnership” means a partnership that:

“Foreign partnership” means a partnership other than a domestic partnership.

“Limited liability partnership” or “domestic limited liability partnership” means a partnership that has filed a statement of qualification under Section 79-13-1001 and does not have a similar statement in effect in any other jurisdiction.

“Partnership” means an association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under Section 79-13-202, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction.

“Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement.

“Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking.

“Partnership interest” or “partner’s interest in the partnership” means all of a partner’s interests in the partnership, including the partner’s transferable interest and all management and other rights.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Property” means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Statement” means a statement of partnership authority under Section 79-13-303, a statement of denial under Section 79-13-304, a statement of dissociation under Section 79-13-704, a statement of dissolution under Section 79-13-805, a statement of merger under Section 79-13-907, a statement of qualification under Section 79-13-1001, a statement of foreign qualification under Section 79-13-1102, or an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing.

“Surviving partnership” means a domestic or foreign partnership into which one or more domestic or foreign partnerships are merged. A surviving partnership may preexist the merger or be created by the merger.

“Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

An order for relief under Title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

Is formed under laws other than the laws of this state; and

Has the status of a limited liability partnership under those laws.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 101; Laws, 2014, ch. 399, § 37, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2015.

Former § 79-13-101 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as § 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, added (4), (6), and (16) and redesignated remaining subsections accordingly; inserted “or ‘domestic limited liability partnership’ ” to present (7).

Statute of frauds did not bar claim by purported partners because the partners’ claims did not involve a dispute over a contract for the sale of lands, but a dispute over partnership profits and assets. An otherwise enforceable verbal partnership agreement did not constitute a contract for the sale of lands under the statute of frauds simply because the purpose of the partnership included the purchase of real estate. Latham v. Johnson, 262 So.3d 569, 2018 Miss. App. LEXIS 314 (Miss. Ct. App. 2018), cert. denied, 260 So.3d 798, 2019 Miss. LEXIS 48 (Miss. 2019).

§79-13-102.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of it;

Has received a notification of it; or

Has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification when the notification:

Comes to the person’s attention; or

Is duly delivered at the person’s place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual’s attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if it maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual’s regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

A partner’s knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, except in the case of a fraud on the partnership committed by or with the consent of that partner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 102, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-103.
Effect of partnership agreement; nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership are governed by the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The partnership agreement may not:

Vary the rights and duties under Section 79-13-105 except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners;

Unreasonably restrict the right of access to books and records under Section 79-13-403(b);

Eliminate the duty of loyalty under Section 79-13-404(b) or 79-13-603(b)(3), but:

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under Section 79-13-404(c) or 79-13-603(b)(3);

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under Section 79-13-404(d), but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the power to dissociate as a partner under Section 79-13-602(a), except to require the notice under Section 79-13-601(1) to be in writing;

Vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in Section 79-13-601(5);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in Section 79-13-801(4), (5), or (6);

Vary the law applicable to a limited liability partnership under Section 79-13-106(b); or

Restrict rights of third parties under this chapter.

The partnership agreement may identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty, if not manifestly unreasonable; or

All of the partners or a number or percentage specified in the partnership agreement may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty;

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 103, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Pursuant to Section 1-1-109, the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation corrected a typographical error in (a). “This chapter” was substituted for “this act” in the second sentence.

Former § 79-13-103 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as § 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.

Denial of the law firm’s motion to compel arbitration and to stay pending completion of arbitration was inappropriate because the direct-benefit estoppel theory requires the nonsignatory claimant, the employee, to arbitrate his claims against the law firm, Miss. Code Ann. § 79-13-103. Richard F. Scruggs & SLF, Inc. v. Wyatt, 60 So.3d 758, 2011 Miss. LEXIS 173 (Miss. 2011).

§79-13-104.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is that specified in Section 75-17-1(1), Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 104, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-105.
Execution, filing, and recording of statements.

A statement may be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed in the Office of the Secretary of State. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located in or transactions that occur in this state.

A certified copy of a statement that has been filed in the Office of the Secretary of State and recorded in the office for recording transfers of real property has the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a certified copy of a statement filed in the Office of the Secretary of State does not have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter.

A statement filed by a partnership must be executed by at least two partners. Other statements must be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

A person who files a statement pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect fees in the amounts specified for the following purposes:

Filing of Statement of Qualification or Statement of Foreign Qualification – Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).

Filing of Certificate Correcting or Amending a Statement of Qualification or Statement of Foreign Qualification – Fifty Dollars ($50.00).

Filing of Certificate of Cancellation of Statement of Qualification or Statement of Foreign Qualification – Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

Any other statement required or permitted to be filed by this chapter – Twenty-five Dollars ($25.00).

The Secretary of State shall have the powers reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 105; Laws, 2007, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

Former § 79-13-105 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as § 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Statement of Qualification or Statement of Foreign Qualification” for “Certificate of Registration of Domestic or Foreign Limited Liability Partnership” throughout (f); and substituted “statement” for “document” in (f)(iv).

§79-13-106.
Governing law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the law of the jurisdiction in which a partnership has its chief executive office governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The law of this state governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for an obligation of a limited liability partnership.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 106, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

§79-13-107.
Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of chapter.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment to or repeal of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 458, § 107, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2005.

Former § 79-13-107 was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 488, § 1105 (codified as § 79-14-1105), effective from and after January 1, 1988. See Editor’s Note under Chapter 13 heading.